District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0161.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Planning Actively for Recreational upKeep So Neighborhood Resources
Elevate Communities Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 6a of An Act To vest in the Commissioners of the District of Columbia
control of street parking in said District, approved July 1, 1898 (30 Stat. 570; D.C. Official Code
§ 10-137.01), is amended as follows:
(a)New subsections (c)(3) and (c)(4) are added to read as follows:


"(c)(3) The Department of Parks and Recreation (“DPR”) shall provide the public with
real-time information regarding the closure or removal of playground or park infrastructure
intended for residents with physical, sensory, cognitive, and other disabilities.
“(4) The Director shall publish a real-time list of inclusive and ADA-compliant
playgrounds and parks on DPR’s website, including the ward, address, description of the
playground, information or website links to sign up for the real-time updates required pursuant to
subsection (c)(4) of this section, and any other details the Director deems necessary.”.
(b)New subsections (f), (g), (h), and (i) are added to read as follows:
"(f) Beginning in fiscal year 2027, the Director of the Department shall submit to the
Mayor for inclusion in the multiyear capital improvements plan required under section 444 of the
District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 800; D.C. Official
Code § 1-204.44), a recreation facility capital improvements plan (“recreation facility CIP”),
which shall include:
“(1) A description of DPR’s objectives to frame decisions within the recreation
facility CIP; provided, that these departmental objectives shall be revised each year to ensure
consistency with the DPR’s strategic plan, master facilities plan, recreation specifications, and
the needs of the community;
“(2) A description of the process and timeline used to develop the recreation
facility CIP, including community engagement;
“(3) A longitudinal and future analysis of neighborhood growth in areas
surrounding a facility, and the respective recreation facility capacity needs;
“(4) Recreation facility specific project recommendations on the timing and
funding for modernization of existing recreation facilities, new recreation facility construction,


and other recreation facility capital improvements planned for the next fiscal year and the
succeeding 5 fiscal years;
“(5) For each project identified pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection:
“(A) A description of the scope of work to be done, schedule of achieved
and projected major milestones, and an explanation for any delay in meeting projected
milestones;
“(B) A justification for the modernization, new construction, or other
capital improvements supported by a recreation specification, DPR’s facilities planning
document, neighborhood growth projections, facility condition assessment, and the assessment
of need for use as a recreation facility;
“(C) A full-funded cost estimate of improvements, except, that for projects
slated for modernization, new construction, or other capital improvements in years 4 through 6 of
the recreation facility CIP, it may include rough order of magnitude estimates of improvements
based on the required general design and longitudinal and future analysis completed pursuant to
paragraph (3) of this subsection;
“(D) A cost estimate of improvements planned for the next fiscal year and
the succeeding 5 fiscal years and a detailed explanation for any proposed increases over 10%
from the prior-year recreation facility CIP estimate;
“(E) The estimated cost of annual maintenance and operations of the
improved recreation facility;
“(F) The lifetime expenditure for the facility;
“(G) The name, address, and ward of each facility;
“(H) The type of recreation facility;


“(I) If the facility is not owned by DPR, a description of which agency and
jurisdiction has ownership;
“(J) A breakdown of project funding by agency and jurisdiction within the
proposed recreation facility CIP;
“(6) For capital improvement projects for small capital investments for which
funding is distributed to more than one facility, the recreation facility CIP shall include:
“(A) A proposed spend plan for the upcoming fiscal year, identifying
which recreation facilities will receive investments and the approximate value of investments;
“(B) A breakdown of the previous year’s expenditures for this project line
identifying recreation facilities that received investments, the value of the investments, and, if
spending deviated the previous year’s spend plan, an explanation as to why the investments did
not proceed as planned; and
“(C) If the facility is not owned by DPR, an explanation of which agency
and jurisdiction has ownership of the facility, the amount of money an agency or jurisdiction
provided for the project in the previous fiscal year, and has budgeted for the upcoming fiscal
year.
“(g) The Mayor shall submit the recreation facility CIP with funding for projects in all six
of the years for which the CIP covers to allow for adequate planning and community feedback.
100 “(h) For purposes of subsection (f) of this section, the term “recreation specification”
101 means a formal document or detailed description outlining the scope, objectives, design,
102 operational requirements, and cost estimates of recreational facilities and services and provided
103 offered by DPR which serves as the basis for budgeting, resource allocation, and compliance
104 with legal and community standards.


105 "(i) For the purposes of this section, the term “recreation facility” means all facilities
106 administered by DPR.”.
107 Sec. 3. The Department of General Services Establishment Act of 2011, effective
108 September 14, 2011 (D.C. Law 19-0021; D.C. Official Code § 10-551.01 et. seq.), is amended by
109 adding a new section 1031a to read as follows:
110 “Sec. 1031a. Recreation facilities master plan and specifications.
111 “(a) In collaboration with the Department of Parks and Recreation (“DPR”), the
112 Department shall conduct an annual survey to update information on the condition of each
113 recreational facilities administered by DPR, including whether each facility is compliant with the
114 Architectual Barriers Act of 1968, approved August 12, 1968 (82 Stat. 718; 42 U.S.C. § 4151 et
115 seq.), the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, approved July 26, 1990 (104 Stat. 327; 42
116 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.), and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1968, approved September
117 26, 1973 (87 Stat. 355; 29 U.S.C.§ 701 et seq.). The survey results shall be disaggregated by
118 facility, made publicly available, and transmitted to the Council Secretary, to the Council
119 chairpersons with oversight jurisdiction over the Department and DPR, and the Office of the City
120 Administrator.
121 “(b)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2027, the Department shall, in collaboration with DPR,
122 develop recreation specifications for recreation facilities.
123 “(2) The recreation specifications shall include standardized designs for recreation
124 facilities, the number of which shall be determined by the Department.
125 “(c) Hearings for public comments and community feedback may be held at the
126 discretion of the Department and DPR.


127 “(d) The Department and DPR shall submit a document detailing the number and
128 description of the standardized designs developed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section to the
129 Council Secretary and to the Council chairpersons with oversight jurisdiction over the
130 Department and DPR by May 1, 2027.
131 “(e) For the purposes of this section, the term:
132 “(1) "Recreation facility” means all facilities administered by DPR.
133 “(2) “Recreation specification” means a formal document or detailed description
134 outlining the scope, objectives, design, operational requirements, and cost estimates of
135 recreational facilities and services and provided offered by DPR which serves as the basis for
136 budgeting, resource allocation, and compliance with legal and community standards.”.
137 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
138 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
139 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
140 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
141 Sec. 5. Effective date.
142 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
143 Mayor, action by Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
144 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
145 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)).